District of Columbia statutes.
50-2534

Expenditure of Performance Parking Pilot Program revenue.

(a)

The Performance Parking Program Fund shall be used for non-automobile transportation investments in each zone. These investments shall supplement or substantially accelerate investments that would otherwise be made by the District.

(b)

The Mayor shall involve performance parking pilot zone residents, businesses, ANCs, and Ward Councilmembers in prioritizing non-automobile transportation improvements. The improvements may include:

(1)

Enhancements to bus and rail facilities to improve access and level of service such as electronic real-time schedule displays outside of stations and stops, display of large, full-color bus and rail maps, bus-only and bus priority lanes, and programs to increase electronic fare payment technologies;

(2)

Enhancements to increase the safety, convenience, and comfort of pedestrians, such as new or improved sidewalks, lighting, signage, benches, improved streetscapes, countdown crosswalk signals, and neighborhood traffic calming;

(3)

Improvements to bicycling infrastructure, such as painted and separated bicycle lanes, installation of public bicycle racks, and way-finding signage for bicyclists; and

(4)

Improvements, which support retail and small businesses, that enhance the pedestrian and customer experience within the zone, such as clean-up and hospitality activities, public safety initiatives, and streetscape and storefront upgrades.

(c)

DC Surface Transit, Inc. shall serve as an official advisory body to the District Department of Transportation for performance parking implementation within the Central Washington Area (as defined in 10 DCMR § 16), except where the Central Washington Area overlaps with preexisting performance parking zones.

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-279, § 5, 55 DCR 11059
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 6083(d), 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 6042(d), 59 DCR 8025
This section is referenced in § 50-2531.01.
D.C. Law 19-21, in subsec. (b), deleted “and” from the end of par. (2), substituted “; and” for a period the end of par. (3), and added par. (4).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 rewrote (a); and added (c).